California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
The judge shall issue a citation directing any custodial parent, guardian, or foster parent of the minor to appear at the time and place set for the hearing, and directing any person having custody or control of the minor concerning whom the petition has been filed to bring the minor with him or her. The notice shall in addition state that a parent, guardian, or foster parent may be required to participate in a counseling or education program with the minor concerning whom the petition has been filed. The notice shall explain the provisions of Section 170.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Personal service shall be made at least 24 hours before the time stated for the appearance.

(History: Added March 7, 2000, by initiative Proposition 21, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

793.

(a) If it appears to the prosecuting attorney, the court, or the probation department that the minor is not performing satisfactorily in the assigned program or is not complying with the terms of the minor’s probation, or that the minor is not benefiting from education, treatment, or rehabilitation, the court shall lift the deferred entry of judgment and schedule a dispositional hearing. If after accepting deferred entry of judgment and during the period in which deferred entry of judgment was granted, the minor is convicted of, or declared to be a person described in Section 602 for the commission of, any felony offense or of any two misdemeanor offenses committed on separate occasions, the judge shall
 enter judgment and schedule a dispositional hearing. If the minor is convicted of, or found to be a person described in Section 602, because of the commission of one misdemeanor offense, or multiple misdemeanor offenses committed during a single occasion, the court may enter judgment and schedule a dispositional hearing.

(b) If the judgment previously deferred is imposed and a dispositional hearing scheduled pursuant to subdivision (a), the juvenile court shall report the complete criminal history of the minor to the Department of Justice, pursuant to Section 602.5.

(c) If the minor has performed satisfactorily during the period in which deferred entry of judgment was granted, at the end of that period the charge or charges in the wardship petition shall be dismissed and the arrest upon
 which the judgment was deferred shall be deemed never to have occurred and any records in the possession of the juvenile court shall be sealed, except that the prosecuting attorney and the probation department of any county shall have access to these records after they are sealed for the limited purpose of determining whether a minor is eligible for deferred entry of judgment pursuant to Section 790 and as described in subdivision (d).

(d) (1) A record that has been sealed pursuant to this section may be accessed, inspected, or utilized by the prosecuting attorney in order to meet a statutory or constitutional obligation to disclose favorable or exculpatory evidence to a defendant in a criminal case in which the prosecuting attorney has reason to believe that access to the record is necessary to meet the disclosure
 obligation. A request to access information in the sealed record for this purpose, including the prosecutor’s rationale for believing that access to the information in the record may be necessary to meet the disclosure obligation and the date by which the records are needed, shall be submitted by the prosecuting attorney to the juvenile court. The juvenile court shall review the case file and records that have been referenced by the prosecutor as necessary to meet the disclosure obligation and any response submitted by the person having the sealed record. The court shall approve the prosecutor’s request to the extent that the court has, upon review of the relevant records, determined that access to a specific sealed record or portion of a sealed record is necessary to enable the prosecuting attorney to comply with the disclosure obligation. If the juvenile court
 approves the prosecuting attorney’s request, the court shall state on the record appropriate limits on the access, inspection, and utilization of the sealed record information in order to protect the confidentiality of the person whose sealed record is accessed pursuant to this subdivision. A ruling allowing disclosure of information pursuant to this subdivision does not affect whether the information is admissible in a criminal or juvenile proceeding. This subdivision does not impose any discovery obligations on a prosecuting attorney that do not already exist.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply to juvenile case files pertaining to matters within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 50, Sec. 4.   (AB 1537)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

794.

When a minor is permitted to participate in a deferred entry of judgment procedure, the judge shall impose, as a condition of probation, the requirement that the minor be subject to warrantless searches of his or her person, residence, or property under his or her control, upon the request of a probation officer or peace officer. The court shall also consider whether imposing random drug or alcohol testing, or both, including urinalysis, would be an appropriate condition of probation. The judge shall also, when appropriate, require the minor to periodically establish compliance with curfew and school attendance requirements. The court may, in consultation with the probation department, impose any other term of probation authorized by this code that the judge believes would assist in the education, treatment, and rehabilitation of the minor and the prevention of criminal activity. The minor may also be required to pay restitution to the victim or victims pursuant to the provisions of this code.

(History: Added March 7, 2000, by initiative Proposition 21, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

795.

The county probation officer or a person designated by the county probation officer shall serve in each county as the program administrator for juveniles granted deferred entry of judgment and shall be responsible for developing, supervising, and monitoring treatment programs and otherwise overseeing the placement and supervision of minors granted probation pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added March 7, 2000, by initiative Proposition 21, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 21. Wards—Appeals [800. - 801.]

800.

(a) (1) A judgment in a proceeding under Section 601 or 602 may be appealed from, by the minor, in the same manner as any final judgment, and any subsequent order may be appealed from, by the minor, as from an order after judgment. Pending appeal of the order or judgment, the granting or refusal to order release shall rest in the discretion of the juvenile court. The appeal shall have precedence over all other cases in the court to which the appeal is taken.

(2) A ruling on a motion to suppress pursuant to Section 700.1 shall be reviewed on appeal even if the judgment is predicated upon an admission of the allegations of the
 petition.

(3) A judgment or subsequent order entered by a referee shall become appealable whenever proceedings pursuant to Section 252, 253, or 254 have become completed or, if proceedings pursuant to Section 252, 253, or 254 are not initiated, when the time for initiating the proceedings has expired.

(b) An appeal may be taken by the people from any of the following:

(1) A ruling on a motion to suppress pursuant to Section 700.1 even if the judgment is a dismissal of the petition or any count or counts of the petition. However, no appeal by the people shall lie as to any count which, if the people are successful, will be the basis for further proceedings subjecting any person to double jeopardy.

(2) An order made after judgment entered pursuant to Section 777 or 785.

(3) An order modifying the jurisdictional finding by reducing the degree of the offense or modifying the offense to a lesser offense.

(4) An order or judgment dismissing or otherwise terminating the action before the minor has been placed in jeopardy, or where the minor has waived jeopardy. If, pursuant to this paragraph, the people prosecute an appeal of the decision or any review of that decision, it shall be binding upon the people and they shall be prohibited from refiling the case which was appealed.

(5) The imposition of an unlawful order at a dispositional hearing, whether or
 not the court suspends the execution of the disposition.

(c) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to authorize an appeal from an order granting probation. Instead, the people may seek appellate review of any grant of probation, whether or not the court imposes disposition, by means of a petition for a writ of mandate or prohibition which is filed within 60 days after probation is granted. The review of any grant of probation shall include review of any order underlying the grant of probation.

(d) An appellant unable to afford counsel, shall be provided a free copy of the transcript in any appeal.

(e) The record shall be prepared and transmitted immediately after filing of the notice of appeal, without
 advance payment of fees. If the appellant is able to afford counsel, the county may seek reimbursement for the cost of the transcripts under subdivision (c) of Section 68511.3 of the Government Code as though the appellant had been granted permission to proceed in forma pauperis. The record shall be prepared and made available to the parties and the appellate court notwithstanding any order by the juvenile court to seal the record pursuant to Section 781 or 786.

(f) All appeals shall be initiated by the filing of notice of appeal in conformity with the requirements of Section 1240.1 of the Penal Code.

(g) The juvenile court may transfer jurisdiction to another county, terminate its jurisdiction, or seal the record or records of the youth under Section 781 or 786 while an appeal is
 pending. The transfer of jurisdiction to another county, termination of jurisdiction, or sealing of records under Section 781 or 786 does not affect the jurisdiction of the appellate court. If the appellate court remands the matter to the juvenile court after jurisdiction has been terminated or the record has been sealed under Section 781 or 786, the juvenile court shall access its records and assume jurisdiction to the extent necessary to follow the directions of the appellate court. If the matter returns to the juvenile court after jurisdiction has been transferred to another county, the matter shall return to the juvenile court that last exercised jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 782, Sec. 11.   (SB 1161)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

801.

(a) An order transferring a minor from the juvenile court to a court of criminal jurisdiction shall be subject to immediate appellate review if a notice of appeal is filed within 30 days of the order transferring the minor to a court of criminal jurisdiction. An order transferring the minor from the juvenile court to a court of criminal jurisdiction may not be heard on appeal from the judgment of conviction.

(b) Upon request of the minor, the superior court shall issue a stay of the criminal court proceedings until a final determination of the appeal. The superior court shall retain jurisdiction to modify or lift the stay upon request of the minor.

(c) The appeal shall have precedence
 in the court to which the appeal is taken and shall be determined as soon as practicable after the notice of appeal is filed.

(d) The Judicial Council shall adopt rules of court to ensure all of the following:

(1) The juvenile court shall advise the minor of the right to appeal, of the necessary steps and time for taking an appeal, and of the right to the appointment of counsel if the minor is unable to retain counsel.

(2) Following the timely filing of a notice of appeal, the prompt preparation and transmittal of the record from the superior court to the appellate court.

(3) Adequate time requirements for counsel and court personnel shall exist to implement the objectives of this section.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section provides for an expedited review on the merits by the appellate court of an order transferring the minor from the juvenile court to a court of criminal jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 195, Sec. 1.   (AB 624)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 22. Wards and Dependent Children—Records [825. - 832.]

825.

The order and findings of the superior court in each case under the provisions of this chapter shall be entered in a suitable book or other form of written record which shall be kept for that purpose and known as the “juvenile court record.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1616.)
-------------------------------------------

825.5.

(a) The clerk of the superior court shall maintain court files and records concerning a minor dependent parent or a nonminor dependent parent of a child who is the subject of a dependency petition separate from court files and records concerning the child.

(b) (1) Dependency court records concerning a minor dependent parent or a nonminor dependent parent may be disclosed to the county and the court in the child’s dependency proceedings; however, information from the records shall only be admitted as evidence in the child’s dependency proceedings pursuant to a court order finding that the information is materially relevant to the case, subject to the provisions of subdivision (a) of
 Section 361.8.

(2) Any party to the child’s dependency proceedings may request the admittance of the records described in paragraph (1) as evidence at any stage of the child’s dependency proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 511, Sec. 2.   (AB 260)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

826.

(a) After five years from the date on which the jurisdiction of the juvenile court over a minor is terminated, the probation officer may destroy all records and papers in the proceedings concerning the minor.

The juvenile court record, which includes all records and papers, any minute book entries, dockets and judgment dockets, shall be destroyed by order of the court as follows: when the person who is the subject of the record reaches the age of 28 years, if the person was alleged or adjudged to be a person described by Section 300, when the person who is the subject of the record reaches the age of 21 years, if the person was alleged or adjudged to be a person described by Section 601, or when the person
 reaches the age of 38 years if the person was alleged or adjudged to be a person described by Section 602, unless for good cause the court determines that the juvenile record shall be retained, or unless the juvenile court record is released to the person who is the subject of the record pursuant to this section. However, a juvenile court record which is not permitted to be sealed pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 781 shall not be destroyed pursuant to this section.

Any person who is the subject of a juvenile court record may by written notice request the juvenile court to release the court record to his or her custody. Wherever possible, the written notice shall include the person’s full name, the person’s date of birth, and the juvenile court case number. Any juvenile court receiving the written notice shall release the court record to the person who is the subject of the record five years after the jurisdiction of the juvenile court over the person has
 terminated, if the person was alleged or adjudged to be a person described by Section 300, or when the person reaches the age of 21 years, if the person was alleged or adjudged to be a person described by Section 601, unless for good cause the court determines that the record shall be retained. Exhibits shall be destroyed as provided under Section 1417 of the Penal Code. For the purpose of this section “destroy” means destroy or dispose of for the purpose of destruction. The proceedings in any case in which the juvenile court record is destroyed or released to the person who is the subject of the record pursuant to this section shall be deemed never to have occurred, and the person may reply accordingly to any inquiry about the events in the case.

(b) If an individual whose juvenile court record has been destroyed or released under subdivision (a) discovers that any other agency still retains a record, the individual may file a petition with
 the court requesting that the records be destroyed. The petition will include the name of the agency and the type of record to be destroyed. The court shall order that such records also be destroyed unless for good cause the court determines to the contrary. The court shall send a copy of the order to each agency and each agency shall destroy records in its custody as directed by the order, and shall advise the court of its compliance. The court shall then destroy the copy of the petition, the order, and the notice of compliance from each agency. Thereafter, the proceedings in such case shall be deemed never to have occurred.

(c) Juvenile court records in juvenile traffic matters, which include all records and papers, any minute book entries, dockets and judgment dockets, may be destroyed after five years from the date on which the jurisdiction of the juvenile court over a minor is terminated, or when the minor reaches the age of 21 years, if
 the person was alleged or adjudged to be a person described by Section 601. Prior to such destruction the original record may be microfilmed or photocopied. Every such reproduction shall be deemed and considered an original; and a transcript, exemplification or certified copy of any such reproduction shall be deemed and considered a transcript, exemplification or certified copy, as the case may be, of the original.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 459, Sec. 23.   (AB 212)   Effective October 4, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

826.5.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 826, at any time before a person reaches the age when his or her records are required to be destroyed, the judge or clerk of the juvenile court or the probation officer may destroy all records and papers, the juvenile court record, any minute book entries, dockets, and judgment dockets in the proceedings concerning the person as a minor if the records and papers, juvenile court record, any minute book entries, dockets, and judgment dockets are microfilmed or photocopied prior to destruction. Exhibits shall be destroyed as provided under Sections 1418, 1418.5, and 1419 of the Penal Code.

(b) Every reproduction shall be deemed and considered an original. A transcript, exemplification, or certified copy of any reproduction shall be deemed and considered a transcript, exemplification, or certified copy, as the case may be, of the original.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 488, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

826.6.

(a) Any minor who is the subject of a petition that has been filed in juvenile court to adjudge the minor a dependent child or a ward of the court shall be given written notice by the clerk of the court upon disposition of the petition or the termination of jurisdiction of the juvenile court of all of the following:

(1) The statutory right of any person who has been the subject of juvenile court proceedings to petition for sealing of the case records.

(2) The statutory provisions regarding the destruction of juvenile court records and records of juvenile court proceedings retained by state or local agencies.

(3) The statutory right of any person who has been the subject of juvenile court proceedings to have his or her juvenile court record released to him or her in lieu of its destruction.

(b) In any juvenile case where a local welfare department, probation department, or district attorney is responsible for notifying the minor of the dismissal, release, or termination of the case, the agency shall provide written notice to the minor of the information specified in subdivision (a) upon the dismissal, release, or termination of the case.

(c) A written form providing the information described in this section shall be prepared by the clerk of the court and shall be made available to juvenile court clerks, probation departments, welfare departments, and district attorneys.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 488, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

826.7.

Juvenile case files that pertain to a child who died as the result of abuse or neglect shall be released by the custodian of records of the county welfare department or agency to the public pursuant to Section 10850.4 or an order issued pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 827.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 468, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

826.8.

Notwithstanding Section 827 and in order to assist with establishing eligibility for programs or services, the State Department of Social Services may provide to a person who was previously adjudged a dependent or ward of the juvenile court, was placed in foster care, and whose dependency or wardship has been dismissed, upon request by that person, the information included in the proof of dependency or wardship document described in subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 391, or any information necessary to provide verification that the person was formerly a dependent or ward of the juvenile court and placed in foster care.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 215, Sec. 1.   (AB 592)   Effective August 17, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

826.9.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 827 and in order to support a person who is or was previously adjudged a dependent or ward of the juvenile court, placed in foster care or on probation, or taken into the custody of the county probation department, in attending an institution of higher education by assisting the person with tasks, such as applying, registering, enrolling, or obtaining financial aid or support, personnel at a county child welfare department, county probation department, or local educational agency may provide, upon request of the person, the
 institution of higher education with either or both of the following:

(1) A sworn attestation, as defined in paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) Section 66020.8 of the Education Code, to be used
 for the purposes described in subdivision (b) of Section 66020.8 of the Education Code.

(2) Information verifying that the person is or was previously adjudged a dependent or ward of the juvenile court, placed in foster care or on probation, or taken into the custody of the county probation department that may only include the following information:

(A) The applicant’s name and date of birth.

(B) The dates during which the applicant was within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, placed in foster care or on probation, or taken into the custody of the county probation department, or, if the applicant was not within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, a statement to that effect.

(C) A statement that the applicant is or was a foster youth or juvenile court ward.

(b) (1) All information received by the institution of higher education pursuant to subdivision (a) is confidential, shall only be used for the purposes specified in subdivision (a), shall only be shared among the institution of higher education’s
 staff who directly facilitate services for the person such as applying, registering, enrolling, or obtaining financial aid or support to the extent that the person is notified or sharing is necessary to facilitate the person’s request and, notwithstanding any other law, shall not be further disclosed or disseminated by the institution of higher education.

(2) The institution of higher education shall retain the information received pursuant to subdivision (a) in a confidential file for three years after the person’s last term of enrollment, after which the confidential file shall be destroyed.

(3) An intentional violation of the confidentiality provisions of this subdivision is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(4) Information obtained pursuant to this section does not in and of itself constitute eligibility for persons who would not otherwise be
 eligible for any service or support intended solely for persons who are or were dependents or placed in foster care.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “institution of higher education” means either of the following:

(1) A public postsecondary educational institution.

(2) A private postsecondary educational institution, including a trade or vocational school or similar program, that has been licensed or authorized to operate by the state in which it operates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 610, Sec. 2.   (AB 243)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

827.

(a) (1) Except as provided in Section 828, a case file may be inspected only by the following:

(A) Court personnel.

(B) The district attorney, a city attorney, or city prosecutor authorized to prosecute criminal or juvenile cases under state law.

(C) The minor who is the subject of the proceeding.

(D) The minor’s parent or guardian.

(E) The attorneys for the parties, judges, referees, other hearing officers, probation officers, and law
 enforcement officers who are actively participating in criminal or juvenile proceedings involving the minor.

(F) (i) The county counsel, city attorney, or any other attorney representing the county child welfare agency in dependency proceedings.

(ii) The county counsel or city attorney representing the child welfare agency or probation department in connection with the administration or review of child welfare or probation services provided by the agency or department to the subject of the case file or to that person’s sibling, parent, or legal guardian.

(G) The superintendent or designee of the school district where the minor is enrolled or attending school.

(H) Members of the child protective agencies as described in Section 11165.9 of the Penal Code.

(I) The State Department of Social Services, to carry out its duties pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 10000) of this code and Part 5 (commencing with Section 7900) of Division 12 of the Family Code to oversee and monitor county child welfare agencies, children in foster care or receiving foster care assistance, and out-of-state placements, Section 10850.4, and paragraph (2).

(J) (i) Authorized staff who are employed by, or authorized staff of entities who are licensed by, the State Department of Social Services, as necessary to the performance of their duties related to resource family
 approval, and authorized staff who are employed by the State Department of Social Services as necessary to inspect, approve, or license, and monitor or investigate community care facilities or resource families, and to ensure that the standards of care and services provided in those facilities are adequate and appropriate, and to ascertain compliance with the rules and regulations to which the facilities are subject.

(ii) The confidential information shall remain confidential except for purposes of inspection, approval or licensing, or monitoring or investigation pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) and Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 1596.70) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code and Article 2 (commencing with Section 16519.5) of Chapter 5 of Part 4 of Division 9. The confidential information may also be used by
 the State Department of Social Services in a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding. The confidential information shall be available only to the judge or hearing officer and to the parties to the case. Names that are confidential shall be listed in attachments separate to the general pleadings. The confidential information shall be sealed after the conclusion of the criminal, civil, or administrative hearings, and may not subsequently be released except in accordance with this subdivision. If the confidential information does not result in a criminal, civil, or administrative proceeding, it shall be sealed after the State Department of Social Services determines that no further action will be taken in the matter. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, confidential information shall not contain the name of the minor.

(K) Members of children’s multidisciplinary teams, persons, or agencies providing treatment or supervision of the minor.

(L) A judge, commissioner, or other hearing officer assigned to a family law case with issues concerning custody or visitation, or both, involving the minor, and the following persons, if actively participating in the family law case: a family court mediator assigned to a case involving the minor pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 3160) of Chapter 11 of Part 2 of Division 8 of the Family Code, a court-appointed evaluator or a person conducting a court-connected child custody evaluation, investigation, or assessment pursuant to Section 3111 or 3118 of the Family Code, and counsel appointed for the minor in the family law case pursuant to Section 3150 of the Family Code. Prior to allowing counsel appointed
 for the minor in the family law case to inspect the file, the court clerk may require counsel to provide a certified copy of the court order appointing the minor’s counsel.

(M) When acting within the scope of investigative duties of an active case, a statutorily authorized or court-appointed investigator who is conducting an investigation pursuant to Section 7663, 7851, or 9001 of the Family Code, or who is actively participating in a guardianship case involving a minor pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 4 of the Probate Code and acting within the scope of the investigator’s duties in that case.

(N) A local child support agency for the purpose of establishing paternity and establishing and enforcing child support orders.

(O) Juvenile justice commissions as established under Section 225. The confidentiality provisions of Section 10850 shall apply to a juvenile justice commission and its members.

(P) The Department of Justice, to carry out its duties pursuant to Sections 290.008 and 290.08 of the Penal Code as the repository for sex offender registration and notification in California.

(Q) Any other person who may be designated by court order of the judge of the juvenile court upon filing a petition.

(R) A probation officer who is preparing a report pursuant to Section 1178 on behalf of a person who was in the custody of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of
 Juvenile Justice and who has petitioned the Board of Juvenile Hearings for an honorable discharge.

(S) (i) The attorneys in an administrative hearing involving the minor or nonminor only as necessary to meet the requirements of Sections 10952 and 10952.5.

(ii) The confidential information shall remain confidential for purposes of the administrative proceeding. The confidential information shall be available only to the judge or hearing officer and to the parties to the case. The confidential information shall be sealed after the conclusion of the administrative hearing, and shall not subsequently be released except in accordance with this subdivision.

(T) Personnel of the State Department of
 Social Services, to carry out the duties of the department pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 9100 of the Family Code or paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 366.26.

(U) Personnel of the Office of Youth and Community Restoration, to carry out the duties of the office pursuant to Sections 2200, 2200.2, 2200.5, and 2200.7.

(V) The attorney representing a person who is, or was, subject to juvenile proceedings under Section 300, 601, or 602.

(W) (i) An attorney representing a party in a civil proceeding filed by, or on behalf of, the person who is the subject of the juvenile case file, in which the defendant is either the child welfare agency, or probation department, or an employee
 of one of those entities, for use in the civil proceeding as provided in this subparagraph.

(ii) Information and copies of records from a juvenile case file received pursuant to this subparagraph may only be used in the civil proceeding and, consistent with paragraph (4), shall not be disseminated to anyone who is not entitled to access under this subparagraph or any other state law or federal law or regulation, and shall not be used or made as an attachment to any other document in any other proceeding without the prior approval of the juvenile court.

(iii) Notwithstanding any other law, and subject to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3), the immigration status of any individual in the juvenile case file,
 and information contained in the juvenile case file that pertains only to a sibling or to a minor who is not the subject of the juvenile case file, shall remain confidential and shall not be released pursuant to this subparagraph absent an order by the juvenile court.

(iv) Notwithstanding paragraph (4), information and copies of records from a juvenile case file may be provided to persons assisting the attorneys for the parties in the civil proceeding for their use in that proceeding without the prior approval of the
 court. Persons assisting the attorneys shall return all copies of records from a juvenile case file provided by an attorney pursuant to this subparagraph at the conclusion of the civil proceeding. 

(v) An attorney who obtains access to a juvenile case file pursuant to this subparagraph and provides copies of records to persons assisting the attorneys for the parties in the civil proceeding for their use in that proceeding pursuant to clause (iii) shall take appropriate steps to ensure that all of the copies of the records are returned to the attorney upon conclusion of the civil
 proceeding. The attorney shall also take appropriate steps to ensure that all copies of records from a juvenile case file obtained pursuant to this subparagraph are destroyed upon the conclusion of the civil
 proceeding consistent with other applicable laws.

(vi) Any information and copies of records from a juvenile case file received pursuant to this subparagraph that is submitted to the court or attached to pleadings in a civil action by an attorney representing a party other than the person who is the subject of the juvenile case file shall be submitted to the court with a motion or application for an order by the court for the submission or pleadings to be filed under seal, unless the judicial officer presiding over the civil matter rules otherwise. The person who is
 the subject of the juvenile case file may object during, or upon the conclusion of, the civil proceeding to any information or copies of records being filed under seal and may request that the information or records be filed without sealing. The court shall grant the request of the person who is the subject of the case file in regards to all information or records contained in the case file, except upon a finding of unusual circumstances.

(vii) For purposes of this subparagraph, “civil proceeding” means a civil action or a government claim filed pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section
 900) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, and subject to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3), juvenile case files, except those relating to matters within the jurisdiction of the court pursuant to Section 601 or 602, that pertain to a deceased child who was within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300, shall be released to the public pursuant to an order by the juvenile court after a petition has been filed and interested parties have been afforded an opportunity to file an objection. Any information relating to another child or that could identify another child, except for information about the deceased, shall be redacted from the juvenile case file prior to release, unless a specific order is made by the juvenile court to the contrary. Except as
 provided in this paragraph, the presiding judge of the juvenile court may issue an order prohibiting or limiting access to the juvenile case file, or any portion thereof, of a deceased child only upon a showing by a preponderance of evidence that release of the juvenile case file or any portion thereof is detrimental to the safety, protection, or physical or emotional well-being of another child who is directly or indirectly connected to the juvenile case that is the subject of the petition.

(B) This paragraph represents a presumption in favor of the release of documents when a child is deceased unless the statutory reasons for confidentiality are shown to exist.

(C) If a child whose records are sought has died, and documents are sought pursuant to this paragraph, no weighing or
 balancing of the interests of those other than a child is permitted.

(D) A petition filed under this paragraph shall be served on interested parties by the petitioner, if the petitioner is in possession of their identity and address, and on the custodian of records. Upon receiving a petition, the custodian of records shall serve a copy of the request upon all interested parties that have not been served by the petitioner or on the interested parties served by the petitioner if the custodian of records possesses information, such as a more recent address, indicating that the service by the petitioner may have been ineffective.

(E) The custodian of records shall serve the petition within 10 calendar days of receipt. If an interested party, including the custodian of records,
 objects to the petition, the party shall file and serve the objection on the petitioning party no later than 15 calendar days after service of the petition.

(F) The petitioning party shall have 10 calendar days to file a reply. The juvenile court shall set the matter for hearing no more than 60 calendar days from the date the petition is served on the custodian of records. The court shall render its decision within 30 days of the hearing. The matter shall be decided solely upon the basis of the petition and supporting exhibits and declarations, if any, the objection and any supporting exhibits or declarations, if any, and the reply and any supporting declarations or exhibits thereto, and argument at hearing. The court may, solely upon its own motion, order the appearance of witnesses. If an objection is not filed to the petition, the court
 shall review the petition and issue its decision within 10 calendar days of the final day for filing the objection. An order of the court shall be immediately reviewable by petition to the appellate court for the issuance of an extraordinary writ.

(3) Access to juvenile case files pertaining to matters within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300 or Section 601 or 602 shall be limited as follows:

(A) If a juvenile case file, or any portion thereof, is privileged or confidential pursuant to any other state law or federal law or regulation, the requirements of that state law or federal law or regulation prohibiting or limiting release of the juvenile case file or any portions thereof shall prevail. Unless a person is listed in subparagraphs (A) to (P),